Virginia statutes. Title 63.1. Welfare (Social Services).
§§ 63.1-1 through 63.1-343.

Repealed by Acts 2002, c. 747, cl. 1, effective October 1, 2002.

Cross references.

As to present provisions relating to state social services, see §

63.2-100

et seq.

Editor’s note.

For note regarding the recodification of Title 63.1 as new Title 63.2 and new Chapters 12 (§

51.5-60

et seq.) and 13 (§

51.5-106

et seq.) of Title 51.5, and accompanying revisions of other material, see Editor’s note under §

63.2-100

.